apertium-eng.eng.dix
<pardef n="le/ave__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ave</l>       <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ave</l>       <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>aving</l>     <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>aving</l>     <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>aving</l>     <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ave</l>       <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aves</l>      <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/ie__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ain</l>       <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ay</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lo/se__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>sing</l>      <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>sing</l>      <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>sing</l>      <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ses</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ma/ke__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>king</l>      <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>king</l>      <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>king</l>      <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kes</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="picnic__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ked</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>king</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>king</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>king</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ked</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="me/et__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>eting</l>     <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>eting</l>     <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>eting</l>     <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/elt__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>elt</l>       <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elt</l>       <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elted</l>     <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olted</l>     <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>elting</l>    <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>elting</l>    <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>elting</l>    <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elt</l>       <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elts</l>      <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elted</l>     <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="read__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="forecast__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="read__vblex"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/and__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ood</l>       <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>anding</l>    <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>anding</l>    <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>anding</l>    <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ands</l>      <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ood</l>       <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="occur__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>red</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ring</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ring</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ring</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>red</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bestir">          <i>bestir</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blur">            <i>blur</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="clutter">         <i>clutter</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="confer">          <i>confer</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="demur">           <i>demur</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forecast">        <i>forecast</i><par n="forecast__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="incur">           <i>incur</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lie">             <i>l</i><par n="l/ie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lie down">        <i>l</i><par n="l/ie__vblex"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="leave">           <i>le</i><par n="le/ave__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="leave here">      <i>le</i><par n="le/ave__vblex"/><p><l><b/>here</l><r><g><b/>here</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="lose">            <i>lo</i><par n="lo/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lose heart">      <i>lo</i><par n="lo/se__vblex"/><p><l><b/>heart</l><r><g><b/>heart</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="lose oneself">    <i>lo</i><par n="lo/se__vblex"/><p><l><b/>oneself</l><r><g><b/>oneself</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="lose weight">     <i>lo</i><par n="lo/se__vblex"/><p><l><b/>weight</l><r><g><b/>weight</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="make a difference"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>difference</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>difference</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="make a pact">     <i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>pact</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>pact</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="make a speech">   <i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>speech</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>speech</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="make concrete">   <i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>concrete</l><r><g><b/>concrete</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="make decisions">  <i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>decisions</l><r><g><b/>decisions</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="make famous">     <i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>famous</l><r><g><b/>famous</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="make meal">       <i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>meal</l><r><g><b/>meal</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="make progress">   <i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>progress</l><r><g><b/>progress</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="make suitable">   <i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>suitable</l><r><g><b/>suitable</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="make use">        <i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>use</l><r><g><b/>use</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="mar">             <i>mar</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="meet">            <i>me</i><par n="me/et__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="meet again">      <i>me</i><par n="me/et__vblex"/><p><l><b/>again</l><r><g><b/>again</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="misunderstand">   <i>misunderst</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="panic">           <i>panic</i><par n="picnic__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="picnic">          <i>picnic</i><par n="picnic__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="read">            <i>read</i><par n="read__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="refer">           <i>refer</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reread">          <i>reread</i><par n="read__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spread">          <i>spread</i><par n="read__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spread out">      <i>spread</i><par n="read__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="spur">            <i>spur</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stand">           <i>st</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stand about">     <i>st</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/><p><l><b/>about</l><r><g><b/>about</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="stand again">     <i>st</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/><p><l><b/>again</l><r><g><b/>again</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="stand in front of"><i>st</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in<b/>front<b/>of</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>front<b/>of</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="stand in the wrong place"><i>st</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in<b/>the<b/>wrong<b/>place</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>the<b/>wrong<b/>place</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="stand out">       <i>st</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="stand trial">     <i>st</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/><p><l><b/>trial</l><r><g><b/>trial</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="tar">             <i>tar</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="understand">      <i>underst</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="withstand">       <i>withst</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/></e>
